Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62M.04, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Additional information. new text begin (a) new text end A utilization review organization may request information in addition to that described in subdivision 3 when there is significant lack of agreement between the utilization review organization and the provider regarding the appropriateness of authorization during the review or appeal process. For purposes of this subdivision, "significant lack of agreement" means that the utilization review organization has: (1) tentatively determined through its professional staff that a service cannot be authorized; (2) referred the case to a physician for review; and (3) talked to deleted text begin or attempted to talk todeleted text end the attending health care professional for further information. new text begin (b) Prior to issuing an adverse determination, the reviewing physician for the utilization review organization under paragraph (a) must contact the attending health care professional to obtain more details on the medical necessity of the service. new text end new text begin (c) new text end Nothing in this chapter prohibits a utilization review organization from requiring submission of data necessary to comply with the quality assurance and utilization review requirements of chapter 62D or other appropriate data or outcome analyses. Sec. 2. new text begin [62M.112] CAUSE OF ACTION; ATTORNEY GENERAL ENFORCEMENT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Cause of action. new text end new text begin (a) An enrollee injured by a denial of a prior authorization by a utilization review organization for a health care service has a cause of action against a utilization review organization if the following occurs: new text end new text begin (1) the utilization review organization has made an adverse determination of both a request for prior authorization and a subsequent appeal by the enrollee's attending health care professional; new text end new text begin (2) the adverse determination deviates from accepted norms of practice in the medical community; new text end new text begin (3) the adverse determination deviates from the recommendation of the enrollee's attending health care professional; and new text end new text begin (4) the adverse determination causes injury to the enrollee. new text end new text begin (b) An enrollee injured by a denial of a prior authorization by a utilization review organization for a health care service may bring an action for medical malpractice against the physician who reviewed the request for prior authorization on behalf of a utilization review organization and recommended denial of the request under section 62M.04, subdivision 4, or 62M.06. new text end new text begin (c) A utilization review organization or a reviewing physician for a utilization review organization may only be found liable under this section if documentation is provided that shows the utilization review organization or reviewing physician disregarded the judgment of the enrollee's attending health care professional and relevant information supporting the initial request for prior authorization or appeal of the adverse determination, or both. new text end new text begin (d) An enrollee may file a complaint to the commissioner responsible for regulating the utilization review organization under section 62M.11 prior to bringing an action, concurrently with a pending action, or after bringing an action under this section. new text end new text begin (e) This section does not create a cause of action against an attending health care professional of an enrollee whose prior authorization was denied. An attending health care professional is immune from civil liability created under this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Attorney general enforcement. new text end new text begin The attorney general may investigate and bring an action against a utilization review organization to enforce this section under section 8.31. new text end